src-fst-affixes-verbs.lexc.md
Meadow Mari verb inflection.


# Verbal continuation lexica

## Auxiliary verbs

Some of these are directed directly from root.lexc

  LEXICON verbs_not_from_xml   

LEXICON negverb  TODO: fix











## Regular verbs

We divide the verbs in two, -am and -em

### The -am class

LEXICON V_am-N  divides V_am in Mood and infinites

LEXICON V_am  divides V_am in Mood and infinites




LEXICON Vam-Mood  divides in Ind, Imprt, Des

LEXICON Vam-Ind  gives all the Ind tenses

LEXICON Vam-Imp   for imperative, Повелительное наклонение:

LEXICON Vam-Des   for desiderative, Желательное наклонение:


### The -em class
First four lexica: V_em with Gerund, the rest without, all going to V_em_ALL to get derivation affixes.

LEXICON V_em  divides V_em in Mood and infinites


LEXICON V_em-1SYLL-j  allow for literary norm until 1970 (Alhoniemi 1985: 105-106) кайше, кайшаш
 +Err/Orth: non-finites ;  until 1972 reform

LEXICON V_em-1SYLL  single syll V_em verbs, do not include bare-stem gerunds in their paradigms

Optional derivation:  All verbs going to V_em_INFL





LEXICON Vem-Mood  divides in Ind, Imprt, Des

LEXICON Vem-Ind   gives all the Ind tenses

* LEXICON Vem-Imp  for imperative, Повелительное наклонение:

* LEXICON Vem-Des  for desiderative, Желательное наклонение:



LEXICON non-finites  contains Mutual endings




















## Special verbs
V_am, возаш : воч

These need work 2012-09-21




* * *
<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [../src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-mhr/blob/main/../src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc)</small>
